Massachusetts, session 194th, H2944.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Notwithstanding section 4 of chapter 32 of the General Laws or any other general or
special law to the contrary, the Massachusetts teachers’ retirement board shall credit Cheryl
DiLisio, an employee of Nahant public schools, with 1.7 years of additional creditable service
for service she rendered to the department from February 1, 2005 to February 1, 2011 for the
purpose of determining her superannuation retirement allowance under paragraph (a) of
subdivision (2) of section 5 of said chapter 32 of the General Laws. Before the date that any
retirement allowance becomes effective in the case of Cheryl DiLisio, she shall pay into the
annuity savings fund of the Massachusetts teachers’ retirement system, in 1 sum or installments,
upon such terms and conditions as the Massachusetts teachers’ retirement system may
prescribe, an amount equal to that which would have been withheld as regular deductions from
her regular compensation for such previous service, together with buyback interest, as defined in
of 2

section 1 of said chapter 32. This act shall not affect any other retirement benefits that Cheryl
DiLisio may otherwise be entitled to.
of 2